src/fst/affixes/postpositions.lexc
!! # Postposition morphology

LEXICON PO_
: K ;

LEXICON PO_ZERO_OR_PX
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** going to K (check, perhaps bad idea) and to Px forms.
: K ;
+PxSg1:%>%{уØ%}м K ;
+PxSg2:%>%{ыØ%}н K ;
+PxSg3:%>э K ;
+PxDu1:%>ме̄н K ;
+PxDu2:%>ы̄н K ;
+PxDu3:%>э̄н K ;
+PxPl1:%>%{уØ%}в K ;
+PxPl2:%>%{ыØ%}н K ;
+PxPl3:%>аныл K ;

LEXICON PO_ABL_paalnyl
+Abl:%-па̄лныл K ;
+Err/Orth+Abl:па̄лныл K ;
+Err/Orth+Abl:палныл K ;
+Err/Orth+Abl:%-палныл K ;
LEXICON PO_LAT_paalyn
+Lat:%-па̄лын K ;
+Err/Orth+Lat:па̄лын K ;
+Err/Orth+Lat:палын K ;
+Err/Orth+Lat:%-палын K ;
LEXICON PO_LOC_paalt
+Loc:%-па̄лт K ;
+Err/Orth+Loc:па̄лт K ;
+Err/Orth+Loc:палт K ;
+Err/Orth+Loc:%-палт K ;
