src/fst/stems/postpositions.lexc
!! # Postpositions

LEXICON Postpositions
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** is the lexicon, containing 3 Po so far.
кастыл+Po:кастыл PO_ZERO_OR_PX ;

ма̄гыс+Po:ма̄гыс PO_ ;
нупыл+Po:нупыл PO_ ;

ма̄гсыл+Po:ма̄гсыл PO_ZERO_OR_PX ;
ёт+Po:ёт PO_ZERO_OR_PX ;

мус+Po:мус PO_ ;
тармыл+Po:тармыл PO_ ;
ултта+Po:ултта PO_ ;
урыл+Po:урыл PO_ ;

!! Relator nouns
щирыл+Po:щирыл PO_ "Relator noun щир" ;

ёлы-па̄лныл+Po:ёлы PO_ABL_paalnyl ;
ёлы-па̄лт+Po:ёлы PO_LOC_paalt ;
ёлы-па̄лын+Po:ёлы PO_LAT_paalyn ;

коны-па̄лныл+Po:коны PO_ABL_paalnyl ;
коны-па̄лт+Po:коны PO_LOC_paalt ;
коны-па̄лын+Po:коны PO_LAT_paalyn ;
